Title
Review for General's Daughter, The (1999)
Number of Reviews
28

Author
Michael Dequina
_The_General's_Daughter_ (R) *** (out of ****)
It appears that the "in" thing for directors of popcorn fluff to do
these days is tackle projects of greater weight--witness _Ace_Ventura_
helmer Tom Shadyac's _Patch_Adams_ and _While_You_Were_Sleeping_ director
Jon Turtletaub's _Instinct_.  Yet while those films proved--all too
painfully--the limits of their respective directors' skills, _Con_Air_
director Simon West respectably stretches beyond slam-bang action
theatrics with the largely absorbing mystery thriller
_The_General's_Daughter_.  
However, West is not completely immune to regressing to his
commercial-bred bag of tricks.  That's not necessarily a bad thing; in
fact, West channels that energy into some effective sequences.  The quick
edits during a big fight scene between Army investigator Paul Brenner
(John Travolta) and a weapons-trading baddie are initially distracting,
but they do succeed in ratcheting up the tension level.  The frenetic
visual style works even more effectively in a harrowing rape scene, where
the cuts keep the onscreen happenings from being overly graphic and
exploitative, all the while still jangling the audience's nerves.
What does become problematic, though, is West's insistence on pleasing
the audience in the broadest terms.  The story, based on the best selling
novel by Nelson DeMille, revolves the brutal murder of the title
character, Army captain Elisabeth Campbell (Leslie Stefanson), an Army
captain; brought in to solve the crime is Brenner and rape investigator
Sarah Sunhill (Madeleine Stowe).  It soon becomes clear that the two have
stumbled onto something bigger, and must (as the tagline goes) "go behind
the lies" to find the truth.  Complex issues of honor, military code, and
loyalty are brought up along the way, and they are all fairly
intelligently handled--that is, until the underwhelming end.  A big
explosion at the climax serves no real purpose other than to inflate the
budget and sate audiences hungry for pyrotechnics.  The film rebounds
with a thought-provoking coda, but instead of leaving audiences with
something to chew on, West spoils the mood with an arbitrary (perhaps
test screening-mandated?) closing text card that divulges the ultimate
fate of one key character.  As if not knowing when to quit, he ruins
things further with rolling the end credits over a pointless shot of
another character literally driving off into the sunset.
Nonetheless, these missteps do not fatally dilute
_The_General's_Daughter_'s effectiveness.  While Christopher Bertolini
and William Goldman's script takes some interesting twists and turns,
what keeps the film gripping are the actors.  Apparently learning a page
from his _Con_Air_ producer, Jerry Bruckheimer, whose instincts at
casting are rarely less than keen, West's actors are a perfect fit for
their roles.  Travolta is ideally cast as the alternately goofy and
no-nonsense yet always on-target Brenner; Stowe, exuding her usual air of
intelligence, works well off of him.  James Woods is in his element as
Elisabeth's shady and slimy mentor; just as intimidating, if not more, is
Clarence Williams III as a colonel loyal to the general (James Cromwell,
carving out a nice post-_Babe_ career as an all-purpose character actor).
Although it has more dramatic heft than a _Con_Air_,
_The_General's_Daughter_ is a fairly comfortable step for West; in the
end, it's still unmistakably a Hollywood entertainment, which kept his
wrong turns from being ruinous ones.  Nonetheless, it is an important
step for him, one that shows that he has a grasp on substance as well as
style--and, as such, making him a filmmaker to keep an eye on.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@iname.com   |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com


Author
Greg King
Like the superb A Few Good Men, The General's Daughter is a
murder mystery that puts the military on trial and probes the rotten
core of the corps.  The film also similarly questions the unblinking
obedience to strict codes of behaviour and disciplined adherence to
"the army way" that leads to abuses.
The catalyst here is the discovery of a bound and brutally
beaten body on a military base.  The victim is a female officer and
psychological warfare expert.  She is also the only child of legendary
general Joe Campbell (James Cromwell, from Babe, etc), a highly
decorated officer who is about to retire from the military and take up
a very high profile position in public life as a vice presidential
candidate.  Campbell is anxious to avoid any hint of scandal, and
wants the murder quietly and quickly investigated before the FBI is
called in.
Assigned the unenviable and politically prickly task is CID
investigator Paul Brenner (John Travolta), who has special powers of
arrest.  We quickly learn that Brenner is something of a maverick, who
shoots first and asks questions later, and who also has a healthy
disdain for following military protocol.  Assisting the investigation
is Sarah Sunhill (Madeleine Stowe), a rape specialist with whom
Brenner had an affair many years earlier.  The pair trample through a
minefield of military secrets, long buried scandals, corruption, and
sordid sex that eventually leads all the way to West Point.  They also
uncover a list of high profile suspects that includes the dead woman's
boss Colonel Moore (a wonderfully smarmy James Woods) and the
general's personal aide (Clarence Williams III, from the original Mod
Squad).
Based on Nelson De Mille's best selling novel, The General's
Daughter is a somewhat brutal and ugly film, with an emphasis on
graphic violence and sordid sex, that will do little for the image of
the army.  The clever and sinuous plot features a number of red
herrings that will keep audiences hooked until the denouement.  One
suspects that veteran script doctor and dual Oscar winning writer
William Goldman is largely responsible for polishing the crackling
dialogue, especially the wonderful interrogation scene between Brenner
and Moore which snaps with clever barbs and verbal one- upmanship.
Director Simon West (who burst onto the screen with the
sensational action thriller Con Air) leaves behind the spectacular
pyrotechnics and spectacular action sequences of his debut to
concentrate more on character and atmosphere here.  Nonetheless his
direction is proficient and he maintains a keen level of suspense
throughout the film.
Travolta brings a dangerous edge and rare intensity to his
performance as the driven Brenner, while Stowe is both tough yet
vulnerable as Sunhill.  Cromwell brings dignity and class to his role
as the veteran general who has devoted his life to the military.  West
has assembled a veritable rogue's gallery, including Timothy Hutton,
Williams, and the brilliant, scene stealing Woods, to flesh out the
list of colourful suspects.

Author
Scott Renshaw
THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER
(Paramount)
Starring:  John Travolta, Madeleine Stowe, James Cromwell, James Woods,
Timothy Hutton, Clarence Williams III.
Screenplay:  Christopher Bertolini and William Goldman, based on the novel
by Nelson DeMille.
Producer:  Mace Neufeld.
Director:  Simon West.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, violence)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER will probably be the cleverest stupid film
we'll see this year -- or perhaps the stupidest clever film.  It's
confusing to a critic when so much knuckleheaded plotting and ostentatious
direction shares the screen with so much snappy dialogue and crisp
character interaction.  That, however, is what happens when legendary
screenwriter William Goldman takes a pass at an otherwise brutally
predictable conspiracy thriller. The punched-up punch lines are ever on
the verge of convincing you THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER has a brain in its
head, even as the remaining 75% of the narrative punches you in the face
with its lack of common sense.
     Our hero is warrant officer Paul Brenner, a brash investigator for
the U. S. Army's Criminal Investigation Division.  His latest case is the
murder of Captain Elisabeth Campbell (Leslie Stefanson) at a Georgia base,
the victim found tied to the ground after an apparent sexual assault and
strangulation.  Complicating the case is the fact that Capt. Campbell is
the daughter of General Joe Campbell (James Cromwell), a war hero and
potential vice-presidential nominee.  General Campbell wants to keep the
case out of the press, which gives Brenner only the 36 hours before the
FBI steps in.  Teamed with rape investigator Sarah Sunhill (Madeleine
Stowe) -- who, coincidentally enough, once had a romantic relationship
with Brenner -- Brenner begins uncovering dark secrets from the late
captain's past that make the case ever more sordid.
     If only the sordidness were the worst of THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER's
problems.  Scenes of sexual degredation do linger much longer than
necessary, their negligible dramatic value overwhelmed by filtered-light
sleaze.  Director Simon West likely thinks he's covered himself by
juxtaposing these images of violence with sweet flowers, but all he does
is prove himself dependent on visual cliches, which is the film's fatal
flaw.  It's a trend he continues for two hours, taking the story's few
virtues and slapping a coat of moron-proof obviousness over them.
Characters who may (wink wink) turn out to be villains are photographed in
ominous shadow; cutaway inserts of the Captain Campbell's still-living
face after the corpse is uncovered insure against five-minute attention
spans.  West just can't help himself from overdirecting every minute of
THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER.  He even turns a scene of footage shown on CNN
into an excuse for slow-fade edits.
     Bubbling up from this overcooked stew are enough tasty lines to
distract you from its smell.  The slickest scene finds Brenner squaring
off with Captain Campbell's mentor, a psychological warfare expert named
Moore (James Woods).  There's something invigorating about watching two
smart actors playing smart characters firing honesty at one another.
Indeed, Travolta gets to sink his teeth into dozens of choice lines based
on his delight at provoking authority figures (to the local sheriff of the
Georgia county: "Shouldn't you be out night-sticking the colored folk?").
Even the lame device of Brenner and Sunhill's sexual history provides a
few winning zingers.  Goldman's dialogue can serve up a bigger laugh than
you'll find in most so-called comedies.
     Dialogue, unfortunately, just isn't enough to make a quality script.
It's difficult to take a movie about a criminal investigation seriously
when the investigators are both too stupid to solve it sooner (an idiotic
inability to recognize the nature of the crime scene) and too lucky for it
to last any longer (not one but two occasions where Brenner catches a
vital piece of evidence out of the corner of his eye).  By the time THE
GENERAL'S DAUGHTER wanders towards its over-wrought, psycho-in-the-rain
finale, West's heavy hand has obliterated most of what made the film
occasionally fun.  It's silly and pretentious film-making, but at least
it provides a giggle or five.  Goldman should tear the 15 decent pages out
of this script and turn them into a stand-up routine.

Author
Jerry Saravia

Recent thrillers have become mired in lurid details and overcooked melodrama.
Some manage to be suspenseful ("8mm") and others are just plain flat and dull.
Nothing can be further from the truth than "The General's Daughter," a silly,
humdrum thriller purporting to be more than the sum of its parts. 
The basic premise deals with the titled character, Captain Elisabeth Campbell
(Leslie Stefanson), who is found strangled, naked and spread-eagled openly at
an Army base. John Travolta is the Army cop, Paul Brenner, assigned to the case
to investigate her death - he met her briefly when she fixed his flat tire.
Everyone at the Army is a possible suspect, and the fierce Paul will do
anything he can to uncover the truth. It seems almost every Army official slept
with Elisabeth. And there are the incriminating S&M videotapes found in her
basement. And there is Elisabeth's father, Gen. Joe Campbell (James Cromwell),
who may be a key figure in her torrid past at West Point Academy. 
"The General's Daughter" heads for the low road once the investigation
begins...simply because nothing remotely interesting happens. Once the S&M
tapes appear, they are whisked away violently by someone in the Army and never
mentioned again. The introduction of Elisabeth's mentor, Col. Robert Moore
(James Woods), a supposedly key figure in psychological warfare and alleged
lover of Elisabeth's, is fascinating but is dispatched too early on. 
We are left with many plot holes after every suspect is questioned - there are
no answers and no logical spins. Instead, we get many red herrings, shopworn
characters, and inexplicable motivations. 
Travolta is one of the film's few virtues. He is charismatic, smart,
unrelenting, and vigorous, if only the script was involving enough to lure our
interest. He does have numerous one-liners and his slight tilt of the head and
cocky walk are more than enough compensation for the thin characterization,
just not enough to save the film. 
Still, the central focus of the film should have been the relationship between
General Campbell and his daughter. The West Point flashbacks are visceral and
powerful but the film peters out with a predictable, anticlimactic conclusion.
The theme seems to be that women have no place in an organization like the Army
- they will be abused, mishandled, or worse, murdered. It's unfortunate the
film does not stay true to its original convictions. 
"The General's Daughter" is nasty and tedious, sacrificing illuminating story
potential about sexism, murder, and scandal in the Army with absurd plot twists
and clinical murder investigations. Once it is over, you may ask yourself: who
was the General's Daughter anyway?

Author
David N. Butterworth
        Big marquee names--Travolta, Stowe, Cromwell, Hutton.  Big Men
Shouting.  A big name director.
        A highly-decorated general with political aspirations.  His lovely
daughter, a career officer, dead--brutalized, raped, and murdered on a
backwoods Georgia army base.  Possible corruption and cover-ups at the
highest echelons of the military.  A CID investigation led by a couple of
warrant officers who, it transpires, were once an item.  And James Woods.
        With ingredients like these, you could be excused for writing off
"The General's Daughter" as a foregone conclusion long before the first few
feet of film pass through the projector.  It's true: the latest film by
"Con Air" director Simon West is very by the numbers, and there aren't a
whole lot of outcomes you won't figure out ahead of time if you've seen
this type of picture before.
        What makes "The General's Daughter" work, however, is a combination
of things which land the film in that eminently satisfying category of
"better than expected."
        First off, John Travolta and Madeleine Stowe, who play
investigators Paul Brenner and Sarah Sunhill, are very good together.
There's a nice equilibrium to their chemistry: they're both tough yet have
a goofy, playful side to their natures, they can spar with the best of
them, they're convincing and likable and very strong.  Brenner's a military
cop with the power to arrest anyone, no matter how high their rank, and
Sunhill's a rape counselor who's thrust together with her former partner to
investigate the brutal murder.
        James Cromwell plays the general, Clarence Williams III is his
chief advisor (spouting lines like "There are three ways of doing things:
the right way, the wrong way, and the Army way"), and Leslie Stefanson
("Flubber") is the eponymous Elisabeth Campbell, an attractive Psychiatric
Operations adviser who helps Brenner change a tire shortly before her
untimely--and truly grisly--end.  All three actors are uniformly solid.
        The writing, too (by Christopher Bertolini and William Goldman,
based on Nelson DeMille's novel), is very sharp.  Brenner makes innumerable
wisecracks throughout the picture but, surprisingly, many of them hit the
target.  Brenner's initial head-to-head with Liz's "mentor" Colonel Robert
Moore (Woods), in which the two men try to outsmart each other, is almost
charming.
        The only miscalculation on the writers' part is having Sunhill
chide Brenner for "not understanding women," but provide "insights" that
are offensive and absurdly out of character.
        Unlike his fellow Jerry Bruckheimer protégé Michael Bay
("Armageddon"), director West realizes that constant camera movement
doesn't equal drama.  "The General's Daughter" is a much subtler piece of
filmmaking than "Con Air," for sure, and only once does West introduce a
hail of the bullets into the proceedings.  He seems to like his helicopters
though...
        Don't go with your instinct to avoid "The General's Daughter"
because you'll miss out on a polished, professional production.  You could
almost call it an enjoyable experience were the central crime not so
monstrous.

Author
David Wilcock
Starring John Travolta, Madeline Stowe and James Cromwell
Directed By Simon West
Running Time: 1 hour 56 minutes
Every once in a while comes the standard 'run off the mill' movie. It's
purpose is to tell a simple story, put in some action and comedy, a little
romance and drama, and give the star something to do. The Generals Daughter
is 1999's run off the mill movie. Travolta, looking fat and sweaty, plays
Paul Brenner, who is called in to investigate a gruesome rape and murder
case. The victim (Leslie Stefanson) happens to be the daughter of a general
(Cromwell) who is planning to run for presidency. Brenner, and rape
investigator Sara Sunhill (Stowe) try to find out who raped and murdered
her, starting with shifty suspect Robert Moore (James Woods.)
Simon West, who brought us the standard action movie in the form of Con Air,
moves onto standard thriller with this. All the elements are there: a shifty
suspect played a well known character actor, suspenseful music, and
naturally a 'thrilling' twist. Unfortunately, The Generals Daughter performs
these elements a little lazier than most other films. Although there's
action, it's not particularly exciting. The music is way to loud during
scenes that should be played quiet. The twist is largely obvious, and James
Woods doesn't get nearly enough screen time to make much of a villain. The
cliched predictability of it all makes a rather boring time for the
audience, which isn't what a thriller should be doing.
The cast go through the motions, looking forward for the pay cheque at the
end. Travolta is obviously doing this for the money, and it must be
embarrassing to have this film on his C.V along with Get Shorty and Pulp
Fiction (and, er, Michael.) He also puts on one of the most atrocious
southern accents heard in western cinema. Madeline Stowe, who hasn't had
some good work for ages, was obviously getting late for the rent payments,
and again just seems to be in this film for the money. James Cromwell delive
rs a performance so average, it's impossible to believe this is the same guy
from the excellent L.A Confidential. And James Woods is suitably over the
top as the suspect, but just disappears from the story. The actors all have
that pained, distant look that plagues every 'run off the mill' movie.
The script, written by Christopher Bertolini and, bizarrely, William
Goldman, is abysmal, and leads largely to the films downfall. Some of the
lines uttered are absolutely hideous, especially during the scene where the
two leads are searching through the victims house. The plot chunders on in
it's predictable way, pulling off virtually no surprises. The film sometimes
gets surprisingly brutal for no apparent reason. And the denouement is so
disappointing, it almost made me cry due to it's poorness (and I didn't shed
a tear throughout E.T.)
The Generals Daughter is no classic, but it's no Burn Hollywood Burn either.
It's slightly boring, deeply flawed, but it's slickly produced. Although not
really worth paying for, The Generals Daughter is perfect television
entertainment: it fills two hours and won't trouble the brain. But Travolta
really should have aimed higher.

Author
Walter Frith
Rather than making sharp independent productions with a low budget and high
degree of skill like his 1994 comeback 'Pulp Fiction', John Travolta has
chosen to embrace the big studio system of commercial enterprise and has
only made two great movies since 'Pulp Fiction' and they are 1995's 'Get
Shorty' and 'Primary Colors' in 1998 for which he should have received an
Oscar nomination.
Travolta's latest disappointment is directed by Simon West ('Con Air) 'who
has a dim eye for supporting characters in this film and structures his
movie like a darkly trimmed and photographed structure of shadows that you
would expect to find in a Tony Scott movie.  In fact, you could throw out
many of the supporting players in this flick with big names like James
Woods, James Cromwell and Timothy Hutton and replace them with minimum wage
actors and you couldn't tell the difference.  The only thing that is worse
than this muddled scenario is that the film's two leads (John Travolta and
Madeline Stowe) don't have distinct sides to their personality and rather
than look like investigators getting deep inside a murder case, they look
more like chess players simply going through the moves.
Getting involved in the plot of 'The General's Daughter' is like meeting an
old acquaintance somewhere in public that you weren't very fond of.  You
want to keep the encounter brief, you want to go on your way as soon as
possible and you want to forget about it as soon as possible.  Getting
involved with this film's characters is like attending an open seminar at a
large banquet centre where a business meeting is going on.  You smile
politely at others, you never get to know them and you'll be glad when it's
all over.
With a screenplay by Christopher Bertolini and the masterful William Goldman
(a major bust here), based on the novel by Nelson DeMille, 'The General's
Daughter' attempts to cover familiar ground with a conclusion you won't care
about and you won't want to tell others about it after you've seen the film
with any great anticipation.
Travolta and Stowe play Paul Brenner and Sarah Sunhill.  One is a warrant
officer and the other a rape investigator who look into the matter of a
young female army captain named Elisabeth Campbell (Leslie Stefanson) who
has been murdered.  Throughout the course of the investigation, they uncover
many potential suspects, including the one they think is the most likely to
have committed the crime, Colonel Moore (James Woods).  There is even the
suspicion that the general may have been the one responsible for his
daughter's death with a high agenda for national political office and a
cover-up that will save his chances at getting elected.  It wouldn't make a
difference if I did give away the ending because chances are you won't care
about it.  Remember 1992's 'The Bodyguard' where the assassin was actually a
minor character that was given little or no focus in the film.......ditto
here and that still gives nothing away because there are so many of them in
'The General's Daughter'.
Strangely, I felt that 'The General's Daughter' had a look and feel to it
similar to 1990's 'Presumed Innocent'.  The characters in that film, such as
the prosecutors, the defence attorney and the wife of the accused were
important but underwritten characters.  Here, the same thing happens with
the film's key players and the film has some rather goofy and amateur
dialogue and situations where the characters think they're impressing those
around them with their intelligence when in fact it's really synthetic and
too obvious.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Stephen Graham
http://www.speakers-podium.com/susangranger.
Susan Granger's review of "THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER" (Paramount Pictures)
 Based on Nelson DeMille's best-selling thriller, this is
serious sleaze. Set on a swampy Southern Army base, the lurid story
mixes rape and murder with betrayal and serious questioning of
powerful West Point principles.  John Travolta stars as a Criminal
Investigation Divison Warrant Officer who is assigned to solve a
bizarre crime. The nude, dead body of the daughter (Leslie Stefanson)
of a distinguished General (James Cromwell) with political ambitions
is found spread-eagled and staked to the ground in the middle of a
training field.  Whodunit? And why? He and his partner, rape counselor
Madeleine Stowe, are given 36 hours to come up with discreet military
answers before the FBI launch their own investigation. Who could have
a motive to kill the beautiful West Point graduate who worked in the
Psychological Operations Unit? Everyone, it seems. From the woman's
Commanding Officer (the always suspicious James Woods) to the base's
Provost Marshal (Timothy Hutton), who seems to pop up repeatedly in
odd places, to the General's fiercely loyal Adjutant (Clarence
Williams III). "How she died seems to be tied to the way she lived,"
Travolta astutely observes, after uncovering some decidedly freaky
films detailing the woman's promiscuous, sordid sex life. Writers
Christopher Bertolini and William Goldman pepper the script with
flippant banter, as if they couldn't make up their minds about how
seriously to take the grisly, gruesome subject matter, and director
Simon West repeatedly contrives to return to the sordid, brutal crime
scene as the murky melodrama unfolds to its ironic, if unlikely,
conclusion.  On the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, "The General's
Daughter" is a perversely kinky 4. It's tortuous, tormented, and
trashy.

Author
Shay Casey
Year: 1999.
Starring John Travolta, Madeline Stowe, James Cromwell, Timothy Hutton,
James Woods, Leslie Stefanson, Daniel von Bargen, Clarence Williams III.
Screenplay by Christopher Bertolini and William Goldman.
Directed by Simon West.
Rated R.
Actors love this stuff. They love to dress up as army guys, stand really
straight, and salute a lot. I mean, it made the careers of such actors as
Louis Gossett Jr. and George C. Scott, while somehow making Demi Moore look
like a respectable actress. This time, John Travolta tries it in "The
General's Daughter," a movie that desperately wants to be a Tom Clancy
adaptation, but falls just short of stuff like "A Clear and Present Danger"
and "Patriot Games." Travolta? Well, he's no Harrison Ford, but he's pretty
good. Too bad the story isn't given the same effort as Travolta gives to his
performance. Otherwise, we'd have a nice little political thriller here.
Travolta plays Sgt. Paul Brenner, an investigator for the military currently
working on an undercover mission to bust a weapons shipment to the leader of
a militia. While on the mission, he meets Elisabeth Campbell (Leslie
Stefanson), a pretty young officer working in the army's psychology
department. After Brenner finishes his original mission, he is called out on
another job, which has Elisabeth dead, bound, and naked in an army training
ground, the apparent victim of rape and strangulation. Brought in to help
Brenner with the investigation is Sarah Sunhill (Madeline Stowe), a rape
expert with whom Brenner has had a romantic past. Further complicating
matters is the fact that Elisabeth is the daughter of respected General
Joseph Campbell (James Cromwell), under whom Brenner served in Vietnam and
who wants the matter kept entirely within the military. Brenner and Sunhill
discover that there is more to the murder than simple rape, as they find
that Elisabeth was involved in sadomasochistic sexual activity, and has more
than her share of skeletons in the closet.
The strongest part of "The General's Daughter" is that all the actors give
enthusiastic performances. Travolta does his best to emulate Harrison Ford,
playing the man with unshakable moral character who must fight for what's
right while everyone else tells him to keep his nose out of it. While he's
not nearly as compelling as Ford was in "A Clear and Present Danger," he
still does a respectable job of carrying the film. He hits the right note in
most scenes and delivers one-liners with fine comic timing. His scenes with
James Woods, playing Elisabeth's teacher who obviously knows more than he's
letting on, are among the best in the movie. Woods' character is a
psychological expert, and Travolta matches him line for line as the two go
through a nicely-written little psychological battle. James Cromwell now
seems to be making a living of playing seedy high-ranking officers with
plenty to hide. After his role in "L.A. Confidential," he's up to his
villainous old tricks here. We're not sure if he's the killer, but there is
little doubt that he had something to do with it. Madeline Stowe, being the
woman, is (not surprisingly) underwritten. These movies just aren't made for
female actors. She has little more to do than follow Travolta around and
make vague allusions to some romantic rendezvous they had years ago. Won't
the writers please give her more to do?
Veteran screenwriter William Goldman was brought in on this project to spice
up the dialogue, and it shows. There are plenty of clever one-liners and
scene-closing zingers in "The General's Daughter." While Goldman may have
gone a bit overboard by ending practically every scene with a snappy joke,
his dialogue is quite good in most scenes. Now, one would think that snappy
dialogue and above-average performances would make for a great movie, but
they don't, because the story is not nearly up to par. What's wrong with it?
First off, the whole thing is pretty routine and, at times, downright silly.
Bad guys are bad guys and good guys are good guys. While we are at no time
certain who the killer is, there is no doubt who was involved. The film runs
into a problem near the end when, after throwing us red herring after red
herring about the identity of the killer, it suddenly has to decide on
someone, and the decision left me somewhat nonplused. The choice seemed
rather arbitrary and was not explained terribly well, a surprise after the
movie has held our hand most of the way through, explaining in great detail
exactly what is going on, and leaving nothing to the imagination. The film
also gets into trouble because of that very dedication to detail. We see the
events of Elisabeth's rape in harsh and unnecessary flashbacks, while her
naked corpse is left out in the open for an awfully long time. I thought it
was standard procedure to cover up the body at a murder scene. In "The
General's Daughter," it is apparently not. Not only that, but most of the
major revelations come in a sort of "Whoops, I found a clue" fashion.
Brenner is constantly noticing things out of the corner of his eye, and
after a while it becomes annoying.
Director Simon West keeps the film moving quickly, if nothing else, but his
direction is far too obvious when it comes to setting the tone for a scene.
There are "meaningful looks" galore in "The General's Daughter." Travolta
walks into a bar and it seems that everyone, even the extras, is glaring at
him. West's attempts to set "mood lighting" only give the impression that
someone forgot to pay the lighting bill. Nobody ever has a well-lit
basement, apartment, or office in a movie like this, and for some reason the
investigators decide to drop in on the crime scene in the dead of night. The
director, along with the screenwriters, also allows random subplots to
disappear at whim. A bit about a meddling local sheriff ends up being used
only as comic relief. The story of Brenner and Sunhill's relationship goes
nowhere, and it becomes clear that it was only mentioned to set up romantic
"tension" between the two, not to develop their characters.
"The General's Daughter" is obviously not trying to win any points for
originality, but at least it could have tried to tell us something new.
Instead, we get mixed messages about women in the military and corruption of
high-ranking officers, nothing that we didn't already see done much better
in "G.I. Jane," or any number of Tom Clancy adaptations. It's too bad that
the story doesn't provide better punch, because this film has a few things
going for it: (1) It's mercifully short (after sitting through oppressively
long films of this genre, a two-hour running time is a blessing), (2) it
boasts an A-list cast, and (3) it has plenty of good dialogue. With those
things going for it, "The General's Daughter" stood a good chance of being
an intriguing military drama. With such a formulaic and obvious plot,
however, it stands as a mediocre entry into the realm of political
thrillers.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Author
Jamie Peck

THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
An occasionally seedy, always adult-oriented agenda is announced the
precise moment "Daughter"'s ball gets rolling, following an unnecessarily
lengthy intro that allows viewers to meet and greet John Travolta in
another sterling dramatic turn. He plays top warrant officer Paul Brenner,
assigned by the army's Criminal Investigation Division to sort through
some sticky business involving an arms buyer on a Georgia base. During his
stay there, the general's daughter (Leslie Stefanson), a captain herself,
turns up dead -- and naked, spread-eagle, tent-staked to the ground and
apparently sexually assaulted. You can probably wager a guess as to
whether or not this movie is your cup of tea already. 
To help him look for leads, Brenner gets paired with a rape specialist
(Madeleine Stowe) with whom he shares a romantic history. The resulting
rekindled-relationship subplot takes up less time than initially
suspected, but still feels tacked-on -- especially while rushing to a
happy resolution over the closing credits. Perhaps it stems from a need to
make sure viewers exit "The General's Daughter" reassured that the world
ain't such a bad place after all, because the material that constitutes a
majority of the preceding two hours certainly suggests the opposite. It's
a monstrously depressing story, really. 
Our protagonists' sleuthing unearths a slew of unsavory revelations from
the victim's past, as well as many shady supporting types. James Woods
clashes masterfully with Travolta as the deceased's enigmatic mentor,
their scenes more explosive than those that contain actual firearms.
Ex-"Mod Squad"-er Clarence Williams III is weird and sweaty as a colonel
intensely loyal to his superiors. Even the notion that the girl's
decorated father (James Cromwell) isn't beyond suspicion won't be news to
fans of the twisty genre. But unsettling shocks are delivered in the
ultimate disclosures of this supremely unusual parent-child bond -- and
it's probably not what you're thinking. 
Sure, "The General's Daughter" is messy in ways most thrillers are: logic
holes, ill-used actors (here, the horribly underrated Timothy Hutton as a
helpful MP) and a weak send-off that botches the actual perp's identity
and motive. But the movie still resonates strongly, particularly the
potent posthumous development of the title character and the solid acting
from Travolta, Woods and Stowe. Stowe overcomes her female-tagalong role
by commanding one of Daughter's most attention-capturing moments: her
shrewd locker-room grilling of a cadet who's concealing important
case-related secrets. 
Director Simon West cut his teeth on 1997's "Con Air," a
testosterone-heavy Simpson-Bruckheimer actioner, and brings similar
stylized visuals to "The General's Daughter" -- meaning that chopper
blades spin in glorious slow-motion and nary an edit lasts longer than 10
seconds. This odd choice pays off, making edgier scenes seem less
exploitative. But why does West plop a statistic over the ending
fade-to-black that estimates the number of women in the armed forces at an
empowering high? Uh, if "Daughter" was supposed to inspire females to be
all they can be, it needs major rewrite.

Author
David Sunga
Written by: William Goldman and Christopher Bertolini. Based on the Nelson
DeMille novel.
Starring: John Travolta, Madeleine Stowe, James Woods, James Cromwell,
Leslie Stefanson
Synopsis: 
Military investigator Paul Brenner teams up with fellow investigator Sarah
Sunhill (Madeleine Stowe) to solve the murder of Capt. Elisabeth Campbell
(Leslie Stefanson), the daughter of political bigwig Gen. Joe Campbell
(James Cromwell). Elisabeth's body was found in an odd position: in the
middle of an army base, naked, and staked to the ground possibly
voluntarily. Brenner and Sunhill soon discover that the deceased was some
kind of nymphomaniac who had sex with nearly every man on base, so their
list of possible suspects is long. 
Opinion:
THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER is a film that tries to be riveting and shocking but
doesn't succeed because the film's details detract from the story line. For
example, the Sheriff's son is said to be the main murder suspect. Yet we
never see the guy: Sunhill and Brenner don't even bother to investigate
him. Or when Sarah Sunhill first enters the picture as Brenner's
investigative partner, we expect her to participate in the story as an
equal cop-buddy-partner. Instead, she just stands around and serves no real
purpose that Brenner can't accomplish without her. Travolta's character
Paul Brenner is supposed to be an ace military detective, but he can't find
a scrap of solid evidence linking the murderer to the act. In fact the
murderer seems to volunteer a confession for no reason when he could have
just as easily denied it. As a result of careless details THE GENERAL'S
DAUGHTER misses its mark as a psychological thriller.
Copyright Š 1999 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Dennis Schwartz
GENERAL'S DAUGHTER, THE (director: Simon West; screenwriter: Christopher
Bertolini/William Goldman/ based on the novel by Nelson DeMille;
cinematographer: Peter Menzies Jr.; editor: Glen Scantlebury; cast: John
Travolta (Paul Brenner), Madeleine Stowe (Sarah Sunhill), James Cromwell
(General Campbell), Timothy Hutton (Colonel Kent), Leslie Stefanson
(Elisabeth Campbell), Clarence Williams 3d (Colonel Fowler), John
Frankenheimer (General Sonnenberg) John Beasley (Colonel Slesinger),
James Woods (Colonel Moore), Rick Dial (Cal Seivers), 1999)
A bizarre murder case comes to Fort MacCallum, Georgia, in this
exciting, over-the-top detective thriller. The general's daughter is
found naked and strangled to death with her arms tied with tent pegs,
while spread-eagled outdoors, where she was mocked-raped. Capt.
Elisabeth Campbell (Stefanson) is the victim. Her Army job on the base,
where her father Joseph Campbell (James Cromwell), is the commanding
general -- is to teach "psychological operations"--or, as the attractive
blonde explains to the CID Army investigator, Warrant Officer Paul
Brenner (John Travolta), who coincidently meets her when she changes his
flat tire, the night before she is killed, "Is to f*ck with people's
minds." It is later learned that the mind she wants to f*ck with, is her
father's. Her mind has already been f*cked with.
The director infuses a dark, sobering mood around the Army base and
drives home the point how power is used there as a corrupting influence,
with military rank counting for everything. The dialogue is well-served
in the hands of the capable cast, as confrontations between the gruff
Travolta and the officers he suspects on the base, which is all of them,
are highly charged. His first meeting with the general is full of pomp,
as he is ushered into the general's antebellum mansion, which is richly
decorated with expensive leather furniture and his collectible military
trophies. The eager Travolta seems to be only too willing to please the
war hero general, someone he respects and served under when he was in
Vietnam. The general is retiring within a week and is considered to be a
possible vice presidential candidate, and is not pleased that this
murder could turn ugly and get out to the public. He tells Travolta that
he wants the Army investigators to get the 'son of a bitch' who did it,
that in another 36-hours the FBI is mandated to take over the case, and
if that happens, the newspapers will have a field day with all the
sexual gossip and gruesome details of the murder.
James Woods in his small part as Elisabeth's boss, has some great
dialogue-dueling scenes with Travolta, who suspects him of being more
than Elisabeth's mentor in psychological warfare. Woods is a career
soldier who is afraid he will have to resign from the service if his
secret is revealed. Col. Kent (Timothy Hutton), the provost marshal,
seems to pop up everywhere and always looks like he's the cat that
swallowed the canary. The general is overly protected by his loyal
aide-de-camp, Col. Fowler (Clarence Williams III), who tells Travolta,
he can investigate the murder: "The right way, the wrong way, or the
Army way. But if he values his career, he will do it the Army way."
Travolta is assigned an Army investigator partner to the case, an old
lover from his days in Brussels, Sarah Sunhill (Madeleine Stowe). Their
conversations and snide remarks while carrying on the investigation
brings on an element of comedy, which seems absurd in the face of how
horrid the murder is, but it is diverting. While they are in Elisabeth's
private residence off base, they uncover a secret passage to a sexual
bondage room with S&M props, where she had sexual encounters with almost
everyone on her father's officer staff. Travolta while further snooping
around, asks Stowe, "What have we got here?" As he stumbles onto a
collection of pornographic videotapes. He then says, "Ten bucks says
these are not the lost 'Honeymooners' episodes." He's right, they are
videos of her sexual encounters, but when he tries to remove them from
the premise, he is jumped by a masked man who steals the tapes from him.
Through some thorough police work on the part of Stowe and Travolta, we
learn via flashback that something traumatic happened to Elisabeth seven
years ago when she was a sophomore at West Point. Evidently, James Woods
knew something about it, as he tells Travolta, "When you find something
that is worst than a savage rape, you'll find out what this murder case
is about." Evidently, Elizabeth couldn't work out her severe
psychological problems from that time and find closure, so she chose to
reenact the incident that is causing her to be damaged goods. This
explanation of what she did, seems far-fetched and takes away a lot of
credibility from the story, which had been thus far, a very ably put
together murder mystery.
Director Simon West (Con Air) has succeeeded in creating a daring film,
that involves a cover-up from the bottom of the chain of command
upwards. He uses the gruesome murder
for all its shock value to somehow intermingle the sex-murder
investigation with comedy. The feminist role in the military and the
male attitude toward women in the military is sharply touched upon. This
story points out the dangers there are from having a promiscuous female
Army captain serving with military personnel who are training for
possible combat. The film was adapted from Nelson DeMille's best seller,
where the former Vietnam veteran expressed displeasure at the increasing
role of women in the military. The most difficult task of the film, was
in stepping on that thin line of veneer between investigating the brutal
murder and pouring over the dead woman's body and then investigating her
actual life, which was filled with tragedy, betrayal, and exploitive
sex. The film throws itself into the dark water and everyone gets
splashed by its jump into water that is too deep for Travolta. It works
as an entertaining and well-acted thriller that could have used more
imagination and less gruesome sexual details in telling its story, as
the military cover-up might have been a more interesting direction to go
than in dwelling on the sordid crime.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus'  World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Jamey Hughton
Starring-John Travolta, Madeleine Stowe, James Cromwell, Timothy Hutton,
MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton:  http://welcome.to/movieviews
I don't appreciate it when a thriller manipulates the viewer into
thinking the plot is interesting, when in fact it's ludicrous. In the
case of The General's Daughter, the plot is more than capable of
intriguing you to a certain point. But at this juncture in the story,
the movie begins to fall apart like a crumbling cookie. This predictable
summer thriller is only sporadically involving, and that is
unfortunately not enough to compensate for all of it's detailed flaws.
Get past one moment early on where John Travolta exercises his southern
accent, and you're likely to survive this entire movie. Travolta plays
Criminal Investigations Divisions officer Paul Brenner, who's working
undercover at a military base when another situation arises: the
apparent rape and murder of a young female officer (Leslie Stefanson).
It turns out that the victim is the daughter of General Joe Campbell
(James Cromwell). Let the investigation begin.
With the assistance of fellow CID investigator Sarah Sunhill (played
rather on-the-sidelines by Madeleine Stowe), Brenner uncovers what
appears to be an intricate and bizarre homicide case. Things begin to
get marginally engrossing when we meet Colonel Moore (James Woods), a
former commanding officer of the deceased who has a few secrets up his
sleeve. Woods submits another scene-stealing performance here as he
oozes authority, surrounded by clouds of smoke emitted from his cigar.
With echoes of his supporting role in True Crime, in which he duked it
out with Clint Eastwood in enjoyably profane verbal exchanges, he makes
every moment believable. Here though, the intense dialogue comes care of
confrontations with Travolta, as the two send mindful, knowing glares
across the room. There are many scenes such as this in The General's
Daughter, in which the veteran cast performs splendidly under pressure,
but the circumstances that tie these meetings together are difficult to
absorb.
Director Simon West (Con Air), shows a watchful eye of delivering a
stylish looking thriller, but he fails miserably when it comes to the
intellectual part of it. The General's Daughter is, more often than not,
a predictable and unexciting mess. It does not help matters that the
plot is virtually actionless, dragging it's heels all the way at a
mind-numbing snails pace. A few brief action scenes, marvelously handled
in the editing department, show that the movie could have delivered such
a more proficient package. From a director who does such a great job of
staging explosions and miraculous stunts, I suggest West should stick
with mindless, rip-roaring action features and attempt to avoid future
projects like this.
Still, the movie is certainly not without it's merits. The acting is
very good from the majority of the experienced cast. The performances
range from commanding (Travolta) to electric (Woods) to stiff-as-a-board
(Cromwell, who doesn't show off his real talents here). Madeleine Stowe
manages to hold her own for a while, but as the female lead in an
action-thriller, she doesn't pull through sufficiently.
One of the problems with the execution is that it's very predictable.
>From minute one, I had few doubts about the identity of the killer in
question. The script even unwillingly points him out for us, using
familiar techniques to hide his guilt until the unmasking toward the
end. In all fairness, we've seen many of the devices used in The
General's Daughter put to greater effect in other films.
The secrets behind the girl's mysterious death are explained gradually,
but by the resolution we have tunneled through so much malarkey that it
feels unnecessary and surprisingly silly. The General's Daughter is not
a terrible movie, and it is involving enough to sustain a viewer's
attention span for a certain period of time. But it just could have been
so much better.
MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton:  http://welcome.to/movieviews

Author
Akiva Gottlieb
rated R
Paramount Pictures
starring John Travolta, Madeleine Stowe, James Cromwell, Timothy
Hutton, Clarence Williams III, James Woods, Leslie Stefanson
based on the novel by Nelson DeMille
written by Christopher Bertolini and William Goldman
directed by Simon West
The topic of debate in "The General's Daughter", a conventional
thriller from Simon West, is whether there is a place for women in the
army. The problem, though, is that the ending fails to present a
clear-cut opinion on the matter. And from watching the film, we don't
have anything to base out opinions on either. "The General's Daughter"
stars John Travolta as an undercover detective who, with a special
agent played by Madeleine Stowe, is investigating the rape and murder
of Capt.  Elizabeth Campbell(Leslie Stefanson), daughter of General
Joe Campbell(James Cromwell). What the two end up finding is a slew of
cover-ups involving some "extracurricular activities". The script is
awful, but things remain interesting because of a touchy subject
matter, and also because of a fine performance by James Woods as a
murder suspect. The most I can say is that it's better than Simon
West's last feature, which was the embarrassing "Con Air". John
Travolta needs a more eclectic role and Madeleine Stowe should use her
tenacity to her advantage. "The General's Daughter" is a so-so
thriller without much originality.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Author
Brian Takeshita
The U.S. Army utilizes a number of books known as field manuals which
stipulate the specific way in which almost every action imaginable
must be done.  One particular field manual is known as the FM 22-5,
which among other things, covers the practice of saluting.  Under the
"saluting" section is a sub-section which covers how a salute is
rendered by a military work detail in the presence of a superior
officer.  The salute is rendered by the highest-ranking individual
present when the superior officer comes within six paces of the
detail, and is dropped when the officer passes six paces from the
detail.  In any event, the salute is rendered only by the man (or
woman) in charge, rather than by the whole group.  Almost at the very
beginning of THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER, we see a general's motorcade
passing a work detail.  Everyone salutes.  It looked impressive, but
it just wasn't right.  That little bit showed me that someone either
didn't do the appropriate research, or made the conscious decision to
go with style over substance for the scene.  In fact, this would serve
as a metaphor for the rest of the picture, as it seems director Simon
West tried so hard to craft a film with atmosphere and flash that he
forgot a coherent story and good characterization are also crucial to
a good movie.  What results is a film that looks good, but like that
one scene, just isn't right.
The first fifteen minutes of the film is a good example.  Paul Brenner
(John Travolta) is an agent for the Army's Criminal Investigation
Division, undercover at a Georgia Army base to investigate an illegal
arms sale.  Prior to the transaction, the buyer gets a whiff that
Brenner isn't the unscrupulous supply sergeant he's supposed to be,
and later that night attempts to kill him by shooting up the houseboat
on which Brenner is living.  So ensues a cat and mouse action sequence
which ends like a certain scene in RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK (we'll just
say that it involves propellers). Brenner then receives new orders
when the commanding general's daughter, Captain Elisabeth Campbell
(Leslie Stefanson), is found naked, bound, and dead on one of the
base's training ranges.  He is teamed with rape investigator Sarah
Sunhill (Madeleine Stowe) to uncover the truth about the peculiarly
gruesome murder.  What I want to know is why the whole action scene
with the arms buyer was even necessary.  It gives no insight into
Brenner, other than the fact that he's a little cocky.  Does the arms
subplot turn up later?  No, so why add this extra running time to the
film?  The answer:  It looked cool.
Or how about the "atmosphere"?  The beginning of THE GENERAL'S
DAUGHTER presents us with imagery of the deep south - thick trees,
dirt roads, sultry colors over water - all backed up with bayouesque
music.  Nice immersion in the setting, but it soon doesn't matter, for
when the film's plot shifts over to the murder investigation, so does
the entire mood.  No attention is paid to the location of the story,
and the music is altered to fit a very generic thriller theme.  Did
the filmmakers start out thinking they were making a different movie?
Instead of creating a cohesive atmospheric theme for the entire film,
we get the distraction of one of theme followed by another, just
because the director thought he should show off some of the
countryside.
The above examples also serve to illustrate that inconsistency is
another problem with this movie.  As I've already mentioned, an entire
section of the film doesn't jibe with the rest, and the
characterization only adds to the difficulty.  Brenner, who comes
across as a man with little respect for authority, suddenly snaps to
in the presence of General Campbell (James Cromwell) and utters some
of the corniest "yes, sir"s I've ever heard.  He even delivers an
emotion-charged monologue about why he will work so hard to catch the
person who killed the General's daughter, even though he was totally
flippant about the whole thing just a couple of minutes previous.
Sunhill, who initially comes across as a professional investigator,
utilizes a couple of blatantly illegal methods to obtain information,
and even revels in her ingenuity.   Both characters are protagonists,
but it's hard to get behind them when their personalities are all over
the place, and in some cases, simply unappealing. 
I could imagine that during filming, West would shoot a scene, then
take the actors aside and tell them, "Let's do it again, but this
time, I want more."  I say this because although Travolta and Stowe
are normally very good, in this film they overact in most of their
scenes.  An even worse offender is Clarence Williams III as the
general's aide, Colonel Fowler.  I swear the guy says all of his lines
from the position of attention.  A far cry from his days as Linc in
"The Mod Squad", I can't help but think he was acting from West's
direction.  A couple of side characters including a West Point
psychologist (John Beasly) and a young female private (Ariyan A.
Johnson) make their scenes nearly impossible to bear.  The only two
actors who seem to have escaped West's influence are James Woods, who
provides a good performance as Colonel Moore, Elisabeth's mentor at
the Psychological Operations unit, and Timothy Hutton as Colonel Kent
of the Military Police.  Woods relishes the role of a man whose job is
playing with people's minds, and does so without ever taking it over
the top.  Hutton just kind of hangs around, but at least he wasn't
overacting.
I haven't read the Nelson DeMille novel on which this movie was based,
but I'll bet more than a few dollars that the story was better in book
form.  The movie version has got characters which come and go with
little or nothing to do except fill up space, or provide bits of
information which seem to neither mean anything in terms of advancing
the story nor reveal any significance once the whole story is
finished.  Every time we're presented with some new aspect to the
case, West gives us more of that flash by playing it up like it's the
most momentous discovery ever, but the information is not used by the
investigators at all.  Instead, when conclusions are drawn, they are
such tremendous leaps of faith that you wonder if successful
investigations are not based on facts, but lucky guesses instead.  The
Army should have saved time by bringing in Brennan and Sunhill,
letting them play a game of twenty questions with the suspects, then
letting them guess who the killer was.  Would've been over in a half
hour.
The film finishes with a sort of bookend, featuring the same style and
southern scenery as the very beginning.  Literally during the closing
credits, we get to see Brennan get in his car and drive off, then we
get to see Sunhill get in her car and drive off.  They both seem kind
of happy.  Maybe they were driving away from Simon West.

Author
Michael Summers
Review: The General's Daughter (1999)
Director:  Simon West   
MPAA Rating: R (Nudity/Sex/Violence/Language)   116 minutes
        This movie stinks!  Although it is professionally crafted and there 
are some decent performances, the plot is so bad it drags the film into the 
abyss.  I knew I was in for trouble when, during the opening establishment 
shots, we see a detailed close-up of Warrant Officer Paul Brenner's (John 
Travolta) military identification card and it is the wrong color.  This might 
seem like a minor detail, but anyone who has spent anytime with the military 
knows that active duty identification cards are green and dependant cards are 
yellow.  And what about the senior military officer whose uniform shirt is so 
wrinkled he looks like he is a recruit on his first day of training.  Or what 
about when Brenner tells a suspect that, because he is in the military, he 
doesn't have the right not to answer his questions even though these rights 
were central to military law well before the Miranda decision.  How hard is it 
to get someone familiar with the military to check these facts?  Now details 
like this could be overlooked if the underlying story held up, but this story 
is so full of holes it is painful to sit through.  For example, at the 
beginning of the film, Paul Brenner, an undercover Army investigator, gets 
into a gun and knife battle at his off-post houseboat and winds-up killing an 
arms dealer he had been investigating.  The local police investigating the 
death are openly hostile to the military and they discover that Brenner has 
been lying to them about the killing.  But instead of arresting him, or at 
least take him into custody for further questioning, they release him. Duh! 
Ultimately, Brenner gets assigned to investigate the murder and possible rape 
of the commanding general's daughter, a young captain also assigned to the 
post. When Brenner finds graphic sex tapes featuring the general's daughter, 
does he use them to generate a suspect list and begin grilling suspects. No, 
his instinct is to suppress them because they might be potentially 
embarrassing.  Eventually, Brenner discovers that this murder is related to a 
violent gang rape at West Point eight years earlier.  I won't even go into the 
totally unbelievable rationale for the Army's suppression of this horrendous 
crime.  I will just mention one final flaw. Brenner is investigating a crime 
that occurred in Georgia.  The rape occurred in West Point, which is in New 
York. He is under a very tight (and totally implausible) 36-hour deadline to 
solve this case.  He needs to discuss the rape with a psychiatrist at West 
Point.  Does he phone the doctor?  No, he travels (via some unexplained very 
fast transport) to New York to question the psychiatrist in person, and then 
he returns to Georgia (again by the miracle transport), without once worrying 
about the impact any of this will have on his deadline.  You have been warned, 
stay away from this one.  
Review by: Mike Summers (BikeMan-202) on 14 March 2000. 
Email: michael@smart.net

Author
Steve Rhodes
Sometimes it takes a while for a movie to reveal its true colors.  THE
GENERAL'S DAUGHTER, on the other hand, has a telling moment quite early
in the story.
As Warrant Officer Paul Brenner, played in a cockily overacted
performance by John Travolta, investigates a horrific murder scene at an
army base, he stares at the naked female officer who has been staked
spread-eagle and then brutally strangled.  Finding no evidence at the
crime scene, he looks up.  Miracle of miracles, he manages to see
something flapping in the breeze way up on top of a building off to the
side.  Quickly climbing to its roof, he fortuitously finds a bag of just
the kind of evidence he needs.
At this point you can already sense that the entire movie will be filled
with such balderdash.  Don't be surprised if many members of your
audience find themselves laughing uncontrollably at all the wrong
moments in the movie's ridiculous plot.  The film, which, sadly, is no
parody, has more plot holes that pot holes on an old country road.  Try
to keep count of them as a way to pass the time.
The dead woman is a member of the base's psychological unit.  Her
father, Lt. Gen. "Fighting Joe" Campbell, who is a week from retirement,
is mentioned as a possible vice-presidential candidate.  He's also the
highly respected base commander.  James Cromwell plays General Campbell
as a clone of the character he played in LA CONFIDENTIAL.
General Campbell instructs Paul to solve the case in 36 hours since,
after that, the FBI and the press will have to be told about it.  The
script by Nelson DeMille, based on Christopher Bertolini's novel, is
filled with cliched, unnatural lines.  "Let me be blunt," the general
tells Paul.  "You are going to have to decide on this one, are you going
to be a soldier or a policeman?  Which one are you?"  Paul, with a
rock-solid chin, looks his superior straight in the eye.  "I'm a
soldier, sir," he snaps back with unquestioning allegiance.
Now given that every room is lit for maximum atmospherics and given that
the editor has a propensity for constantly cutting to ominous choppers
circling overhead, do you think something sinister might be going on?
Do you think the general might be involved?
The strait-laced, dead officer turns out to have had a secret, or
perhaps not so secret, obsession for sadomasochistic sex, and she
conveniently left lots of videos.  THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER quickly
degenerates to the sleazy level of the recent film 8MM.  The most
repugnant part of the story is the way in which it exploits rape and
rape victims for lurid titillation.
Madeleine Stowe, playing Warrant Officer Sara Sunhill, a rape counselor
and investigator, joins Paul on the case.  They have the typical
love/hate relationship of cop buddies.
Director Simon West (CON AIR) is much more concerned with dramatic
images than story telling.  One time he has a cat go to the window and
rub his bloody paws on it to signify that his owner is dead.  The
director has little regard for the intelligence of the audience.  Every
move is so telegraphed in advance that the film contains little genuine
mystery.
Characters are so obviously either bad or good that the costume
department might as well have passed out black hats to one group and
white hats to the other.  The killer, in particular, is quite easy to
spot.
Even the usually reliable James Woods doesn't lend any credibility or
interest to the film.  He seems set on playing a parody of himself.
The soldiers on the base tarnish their reputations with their actions.
In the same way the actors disgrace themselves by being associated with
such a ridiculous movie.  Most deliver decidedly subpar performances in
a movie that is already in trouble because of the script and direction.
Perhaps they will be lucky and the movie will leave the theaters before
anyone remembers it ever existed.
THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER runs 2:00.  It is rated R for strong sex, rape,
sadomasochism, nudity, violence, and profanity.  Since it pushes the
limit of the R rating, it should be considered acceptable only for the
oldest and most mature teenagers.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Bob Bloom

 The General's Daughter (1999) 3 stars out of 4. Starring John Travolta,
Madeleine Stowe, James Woods, James Cromwell, Timothy Hutton, Leslie
Stefanson and Clarence Williams III
 "The General's Daughter" is a slick thriller with crackling dialogue,
interesting characters and an intriguing mystery.
 It's an adult melodrama with crisp, give-and-take repartee between
protagonists.
 The "who" of the murder mystery isn't as interesting as the "why."
 "The General's Daughter" stars John Travolta as warrant officer Paul
Brenner, a top investigator for the Army's Criminal Investigation Division.
Brenner is called upon the solve the killing of Capt. Elisabeth Campbell
(Leslie Stefanson), the daughter of base commander Gen. "Fighting Joe"
Campbell, who is due to retire within the week and possibly enter the
political arena.
 Brenner is under pressure to solve the killing within 36 hours or the case
will be turned over to the civilian authorities. Aiding him in his
investigation is another CID agent Sarah Sunhill (Madeleine Stowe) a former
flame.
 Together they uncover a slag heap of sexual deviation, buried secrets and
enough suspects to fill a platoon.
 The screenplay by Christopher Bertolini and the legendary William Goldman
("All the President's Men," "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid," "Marathon
Man") is based on the best-selling novel by Nelson DeMille.
 The writing is abetted by Travolta's timing and superb delivery. His
Brenner is a juggernaut who, despite knowing the Army way of doing things,
plows straight ahead in his search for the truth.
 A scene in which Travolta's Brenner interrogates Col. Robert Moore
(scene-stealer James Woods) just bristles with tension as the two spar in a
verbal chess match.
 You get so engrossed in the dialogue and interplay between characters, yet
you never get lost as the plot twists and turns on its way to a nearly
satisfying solution.
 Without giving too much away, let's just say after all the huffing,
puffing and investigating, the final piece of the puzzle fits a bit too
easy and conveniently to tidy up all the loose ends.
 Nevertheless, "The General's Daughter" sparkles with wit. It is no
plodding murder mystery. Rather it jogs along at a steady pace allowing its
audience to keep up.
Fine performances abound. Stowe is smart, sassy and sexy as the CID
investigator who gives as good as she gets from the chauvenistic soldiers
with whom she must deal.
 Woods is wily and a bit vulnerable as the commanding officer of the murder
victim, while James Cromwell is cold, calculating and tough as the famous
general.
 Also along for the proceedings are Timothy Hutton as Col. Kent, the base's
Provost Marshall, and Clarence Williams III as a top aide to Gen. Campbell.
 Stefanson as Capt. Campbell exudes a sexuality that her uniform cannot
hide. Yet, in her small role, she also shows a kind-hearted spirit as well
as a vulnerability that makes her death even the more tragic.
 "The General's Daughter" is an well-packaged drama that, despite a couple
of obvious plot holes, won't disappoint.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Paramount Pictures
 Director:  Simon West
 Writer:  Nelson DeMille (novel), Christopher Bertolini, William
Goldman
 Cast: John Travolta, Madeleine Stowe, James Cromwell,
Timothy Hutton, Clarence Williams III, James Woods
   "The General's Daughter" is the sort of movie that will be
cheered by people who hate their fathers.  Throw in folks who
dislike and mistrust all authority and you have a box office
success. Just wait for the hoops and hollers when the
honchos get their comeuppance! But if you have good taste
you'll recognize early on that while the concept that drives the
film has originality, Simon West directs Christopher Bertolini
and William Goldman's screenplay--based on a novel of the
same name by Nelson DeMille--with the usual plot
mechanisms, a conventional narrative approach, and hyped
soundtracks to create dramatic tension when virtually none
exists.  (You know that a film is desperate when the music
division resorts to the greatest cliche of all, Carmina Burana--
which is more appropriate to horror flicks.)   
   Since "The General's Daughter" involves crimes of violence
in the military with cover-ups abounding, it brings to mind
similar works like "A Few Good Men" and "A Soldier's Story." 
The former movie, based on a Broadway play, deals with the
trial of two Marines for complicity in the death of a fellow
Marine while they were serving on the U.S. military base on
Guantanamo.  The case puts the whole military mentality on
trial.  In the latter film, which is based on an off-Broadway
play, a white commanding officer in charge of a black
company whose sergeant has been murdered has the military
on edge because the killer may be a white officer or a
member of the local Klan.  The point: when films deal with
the genre of crime in the military, they often consider
investigations to be nothing less than inquiries that could
shake the entire armed forces to their foundation.  "The
General's Daughter" is no exception.
   "The General's Daughter" focuses on Warrant Officer Paul
Brenner (John Travolta), a sergeant who is working
undercover with the army's criminal investigation division.
Though a non-commissioned officer, he seems to have the
authority to bust personnel as high as generals, but not just
to apprehend them.  He just loves to use his superior brawn
to get the perps into hammerlocks, cuff them, throw them
against walls, and then tell their lawyers that in this man's
army the defendants do not have the right to counsel.  He is
conveniently paired with Warrant Officer Sarah Sunderland
(Madeleine Stowe) with whom--for no reason other than to
create romantic tension when none would ordinarily exist--he
once had a dalliance.  The story opens on Lt. General
Campbell (James Cromwell, the farmer from "Babe"), who is
receiving a retirement banquet from hordes of officers as the
great man prepares to accept a vice presidential nomination. 
(Wouldn't it be great to see this apparatchik get his from a
sergeant?)  When the general's daughter, Capt. Elizabeth
Campbell (Leslie Stefanson), is raped and strangled, Brenner
and Sunderland take swift action to get to the bottom of the
crime, but not before Brenner proves his vigor by ridding Fort
MacCallum of a racist gun-runner.
   This initial James-Bond style escapade serves as the only
exciting moment of shoot-em-up dynamics.  Subsequently,
the movie sinks into the usual unbelievable scenes 
commonly found in whodunits that feature flat dialogue,
macho men, vulnerable women, crazed killers, nutty victims,
and/or cover-up attempts involving high officials.  The
discovery of porn tapes in one officer's secret room--in the
living quarters of the army official you'd least expect to
possess these--creates renewed interest part-way into the
story, but before this movie can begin to drum up the interest
found in "8mm" the detectives are off on the more banal
cause: to blow the lid off the military.
   Travolta is most interesting during the first couple of
minutes when he puts on a convincing Bill Clinton accent to
fool the MP's at the fort, but then spends his time either
manhandling people well above his rank or flirting badly with
his partner, played without enthusiasm by the Madeleine
Stowe.  You'd think that Col. Fowler (Clarence Williams III),
who is the right-hand man of the general, would crack a little
smile, just once, and that Timothy Hutton would try to show
us some of the charm he rewarded us with as a college
instructor in "The Substance of Fire."  But no...everyone in
this picture takes himself or herself far too seriously as if to
prove that if you don't crack a smile or burst into laughter at
the silliness of the plot, you must be a darn good actor. 

Author
James Brundage
Written by William Goldman and Christopher Bertolini
Based upon the novel by Nelson DeMille
Starring John Travolta, Madeleine Stowe, James Woods, James Cromwell, and
Leslie Stefanson
 I should have trusted Madeleine Stowe.  I should have trusted James Woods.
Both of these people have never disappointed me in a film, yet, when I heard
that Simon West was helming The General's Daughter, my first reaction was
that of an anorexic approached with an all-you-can-eat buffet: I wanted to
stay away from it.
 As the date of release approached, the buzz got worse and worse.  A critic
or two gave it positive reviews, but it was (no pun intended) generally
loathed.  A good friend of mine in New Jersey expressed his utter revulsion
for this film in words that I cannot print casually.  When I went to the
film itself, I expected complete and utter crap.
 I did not get high art.  I didn't even get a good film, really.  But, the
point of this review is: The General's Daughter is not as bad as it is made
out to be.
 Simon West still can't handle a camera for anything longer than the
duration of a music video (his normal format).  He can't coach actors.  The
script still has the trademark William Goldman lines, bits and pieces of
dialogue so utterly terrible that you want to find out his address for the
sake of killing him.  John Travolta doesn't give an Oscar worthy
performance, but a Razzie may be coming his way if he keeps this kind of
crap up.
 Yet The General's Daughter is enjoyable.
 The plot holds more water than most of the William Goldman screenplays,
probably because of the fact that it is based off of a novel, which offers
much less opportunity for Goldman to screw it up.  In short: Captain
Elizabeth Campbell (Leslie Stefanson) is found tied spread-eagle and
strangled on her father's (a prestigious general considering a career in
politics, which means that he's off to a fine start) military base and a
bunch of Criminal Investigations Division warrant officers (played by John
Travolta and Madeline Stowe).
 From a few minutes into the movie its fairly easy to see who the villains
are and what will end up happening, but what happens next is sketchy.  You
know the end, but not the middle.  Such a combination makes for what will
come off on the average viewer as a good mystery and come off on the
intelligent viewer as mindless fun.
 Unlike Con Air, which had no plot, the plot of The General's Daughter is
sufficient to carry it through the 116 minute running time, albeit with a
few times where it appears to drag its feet.  James Woods remains my drug of
choice for any movie which has a manipulative, dark character and he plays a
psychological warfare Colonel to near-perfection.  Madeleine Stowe proves
once again that she is one of the hidden treasures of Hollywood, an actress
able to make a proverbial shwing and actually perform well at the same time.
James Cromwell continues his typecasted-as-sinister routine.  All through
the movie, I kept hearing "Boy-o", his most used line from LA Confidential.
 All of that said and done, The General's Daughter lacks in more respects
than it has assets.  For instance, Simon West wastes John Travolta as an
actor; not to mention doesn't expand on the ideas that should be expanded
upon.  He is one of the many ex-MTV directors who have no clue how to handle
film past four minutes.  Face it boys, if you can't change a reel, don't
ever get into the features.  The script is terrible and the action is worse.
You never really feel care or tension.
 But, it's fun.  And, in summer, fun is all that matters.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: Simon West
Cast: John Travolta, Madeleine Stowe, James Cromwell, Timothy Hutton,
Clarence Williams III, James Woods, Rick Dial, Leslie Stefanson
Screenplay: Christopher Bertolini, William Goldman (based on a novel by
Nelson DeMille)
Producers: Mace Neufeld
Runtime: 120 min.
US Distribution: Paramount Pictures
Rated R: Graphic sexual violence, nudity, language
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
The General's Daughter is a heartless, absurd film, a movie so
hopelessly dedicated to its inane plot that it forgets entirely about
its own characters.  Director Simon West treats issues like rape and
sexual fetish with ham-handed obscenity, creating a film that banks
almost entirely on exploitation and offensive pseudo-depth.  What's
worse is that the movie is haphazardly glued together by two characters
who are neither interesting nor sympathetic -- the ridiculous story
requires them to do unbelievable things in the interest of reaching a
dark conclusion in a sudden rain storm.
John Travolta finds himself in the middle of the mess, playing Warrant
Officer Paul Brenner; Brenner is assigned to find the murderer and rape
of Captain Elizabeth Campbell (Leslie Stefanson), daughter of General
Joe Campbell (James Cromwell).  Brenner is teamed up with ex-spouse
Sarah Sunderland (Madeline Stowe), and they check out all the suspects
on the base, including Elizabeth's mentor, Colonel Moore (James Woods). 
Soon, it becomes apparent that Elizabeth was into kinky sexual stuff,
but the question comes down to why -- and, of course, who.  
Ebert's Law of the Economy of Characters can be applied here; one
interesting thing I noted is that not only are all the characters
suspects at some point (including the two protagonists), but almost all
of them end up directly intertwined with the story.  Perhaps I should
have issued a spoiler alert before mentioning that, but it's painfully
obvious from the beginning that everyone in the film is hiding
something.  On a story level, The General's Daughter is ineptly
constructed.  The film, adapted by Christopher Bertolini and William
Goldman from Nelson DeMille's novel (which was apparently based on a
true story), plods along to its conclusion, filling in the blanks with
stale, unrealistic dialogue and "shocking" plot developments.
Having not read the novel, it's difficult to determine if these
problems are the fault of the adapters or the original author, but I
suppose they all are guilty to some degree.  Scene after scene stumbles
with pointless insincerity; minutes after finding the dead young woman,
Brenner and Sunderland engage in sarcastic dialogue, which includes
endless strings of forced lines.  (Sunderland actually asks Brenner,
"Why was she killed?" to which I would have answered, "If I knew, then
the movie would already be over.")  Only after we've spent twenty
minutes or so with these characters do we learn that they have a sordid
history together; this angle, though apparently present to develop their
characters, is never explored.
Not that it really matters, since the characters consistently do
ludicrous things for no other reason than to drive the plot.  In one
scene, Sunderland is attacked by a man in a mask.  She sees one of his
rings, and she and Brenner find the man later that day based on the
ring.  Instead of questioning him like as they would a real suspect,
they take him to Brenner's houseboat, beat him up, and pour hot coffee
in his lap.  This scene really pushed me over the edge, not because it's
gratuitous and mean-spirited, but because it illustrates the film's
complete disregard for the characters and the audience.  It was
impossible for me to feel anything for these people beyond this scene,
mostly because nothing they do comes as a surprise.  I realized that
these constructs on screen aren't actually characters, but devices
present only to serve the story.
This would have been bad enough without the West's need to hose his
movie down in tasteless images of rape and sexual misconduct. 
Compelling films about sexual crimes don't spend a lot of time on rape
flashbacks, and they certainly don't show as much skin and sweat as a
typical pornographic picture.  These scenes are not the least bit
powerful; on the contrary, they're intended simply to provide the
audience with the necessary resentment for the villain, whomever that
may turn out to be.  In addition, the movie treats sexual fetishes --
and sadomasochism in particular -- as if it's a perversion of everything
we know to be pure.  This standpoint is certainly allowed, but only in
accompaniment with well-developed themes to back it up.  As it is, the
film forgets that a lot of people have sexual fetishes, and that putting
on a pair of handcuffs does not make a person insane.
Perhaps the only positive elements in The General's Daughter are a
couple of the performances.  James Woods has a few terrific scenes, and
plays his role with sharp, witty subtlety.  I also liked James Cromwell,
mostly because he comes across as slightly sympathetic despite the
obvious intent of West to make him villainous.  Nonetheless, these
performances are undermined entirely by the dreary, obligatory
atmosphere and the senseless neglect of characterization.  The General's
Daughter is the worst kind of Hollywood film -- it pretends to have a
soul, to be of strict moral code, when in fact it has nothing more than
a group of cardboard cut-outs force-feeding the audience a toxic
landfill of plot contrivances and one-sided moral judgments.  

Author
Jonathan Richards
     Just in time for Father's Day, "The General's Daughter" swaggered
onto the big screen last weekend with a heartwarming story about a
dysfunctional father-daughter relationship in the military.  If you
can't say anything nice, my mother taught me, don't say anything at
all, so I'll keep this short.
There's a cast of good actors doing their best with lines like
"She could change a tire, and bake a hell of a key lime pie."  That
line falls to James Cromwell, in his heavy mode here (see
"L.A. Confidential") as the General in a sober scene as he recalls his
beloved murdered daughter.  The daughter is well played by Leslie
Stephanson while she lasts -- we even get to see the tire-changing
scene.  John Travolta is the Army cop investigating her murder, and he
does a better job than the writers have any right to expect with their
dialogue.  Madeleine Stowe as his co-investigator and
once-and-possibly-future love interest is beautiful as always, but
shows few signs of acting.  Most of the rest of the characters are
colonels -- Clarence Williams III (of the original "Mod Squad"), John
Beasley, Timothy Hutton, and James Woods (whose cagey scenes with
Travolta are the best in this whole sorry affair.)  One of these
colonels is in the movie for no discernible purpose other than to be a
surprise bad guy, and you won't have much trouble guessing which.
Early on there's one of those .007 plot-irrelevant action scenes
which explodes and disappears without a trace.  Then it's on to the
sex-and-titillation stuff, which involves your usual
stars-looking-at-porn-with-distaste, and then a particularly vicious
and gratuitous rape scene where the girl is stripped and spread-eagled
to tent pegs, calculated to shock and horrify but still grab the
attention with a nicely backlit breast.  It's the worst kind of sleazy
cinematic pandering.
The whole thing is shot and paced like a bad John Grisham TV
movie.  There's heavy-handed exposition, tortuous plot twists and
connections, and material just plain too ridiculous to turn on the
projector for.  The general's daughter, a captain in Psy-Ops, explains
her work to Travolta: "Mostly we just fuck with people's minds."  In
this movie, our minds never get that lucky.

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
By-the-numbers: A film which introduces characters, situations, dilemmas and
developments that we've seen before in a parade of other films. A film which
can easily be guessed out by the end of frame number one. A film which is
packed to the cap with predictability, leading to very little tension,
excitement, suspense or interest on the part of its paying audience. In
short, a cliché-ridden formula film. Welcome to my review of THE GENERAL'S
DAUGHTER.
PLOT:
An undercover Army detective and a rape counselor find themselves locked
inside an investigation into some bigwig General daughter's rape, torture
and murder. They must delve through all of the unspoken Army rules and the
hush-hushes, to figure out the conspiracy behind the shocking murder.
CRITIQUE:
By the numbers (see above). This film is just there. It sits there on the
big screen for a couple of hours, floats around, goes away, hopefully never
to be heard from again. It is so predictable that even a blind man could see
its plot points coming a mile away. It's as suspenseful as a leaf dropping
from a tree. It's as action-packed as a Canadian curling tournament. Get the
picture? I sure did...it's too bad that it took my friend and I less than
two minutes to figure out the entire plot, and to break down each scene
before it was even completed. Easy as pie. It's unfortunate because James
Woods and John Travolta actually have one extremely enjoyable scene together
near the beginning of the film, but alas, t'was not to be (That scene alone
scored two of my four points allotted.) Woods chews it up in the few scenes
that he's in, Travolta passes the test, Cromwell plays, well, Cromwell, and
Stowe is window dressing with a smile (MIA since 12 MONKEYS (8/10) it
seems).
And this predictability isn't reserved only to those who have seen films
like COURAGE UNDER FIRE or A FEW GOOD MEN, it runs deep inside every one of
us who knows to suspect someone as soon as they see their obvious guilty mug
on the big screen. It's like riding a bike. Other scenarios which sponge out
any tension, suspense or interest from this film include every single
character eventually "breaking down" to the investigators without much
reason given, a ridiculously placed background relationship between two of
the lead characters, as much action as my grandparents bedroom nightly, and
a directorial style that can only reward director Simon West with a solid
nomination for the "Best Poor Man's Michael Bay Doing his Best Poor Man's
Impression of Tony Scott" (Add two scenes with sunlight shining through some
half-open shades for grit and integrity, and an all-out rainfall for the
finale for further chaos, and you're a great director. Yawn. Yeah, whatever
Tony...I mean, Simon.)
And aren't we all sick of hearing about these Army "bad boys" and their
overdone "code of silence"?! Enough already! Next subject, please. See it on
video if you wanna fall asleep after seeing a much better movie like AN
OFFICER AND A GENTLEMAN (8.5/10). Otherwise, save yourself the trouble and
go take a crap instead. You'll feel much better afterwards. Trust me.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Ironically, John Travolta turned down the lead role in AN OFFICER AND A
GENTLEMAN, which eventually went to little Dickie Gere. Ironically on James
Woods' part, he completed one of his earliest acting roles on TV's "Welcome
Back, Kotter", starring none other than John Travolta.
Actor James Woods recently confirmed reports of his "big dick" on Howard
Stern's radio program. Unlike rocker Tommy Lee, Woods is also alleged to
have an IQ of 180. He apparently scored a perfect 800 on his verbal SATs and
a 779 on the math section. What a man!
John Travolta is married to actress Kelly Preston, and they have a son named
Jett (Travolta loves them planes!). Word on the street is that the kid was
apparently conceived during a weekend at Demi Moore and Bruce Willis' home.
Director Simon West's first film was the Jerry Bruckheimer produced CON AIR
(6.5/10). Before that, he directed TV commercials including the Budweiser ad
with the dancing ants. Yippee!
Veteran director John Frankenheimer (RONIN (7.5/10), THE MANCHURIAN
CANDIDATE) portrays the character of General Sonnenberg in this film. The
IMDb reports that when Senator Robert Kennedy was shot at the Ambassador
Hotel in Los Angeles on June 5, 1968, it was his good friend John
Frankenheimer who had personally driven him there that day.
Clarence Williams III, who plays Colonel Fowler in this film, is known to
some from his role as "Linc" in the original "Mod Squad" TV series. Younger
folk may remember him as Prince's father in PURPLE RAIN.

Author
Michael Redman
We all have skeletons in our closet we'd rather not broadcast to the
world. An ill-advised affair, illegal activities, sexual peccadilloes,
a secret appetite for fried baloney and Velvetta sandwiches: it's a
rare person without dirty laundry.
Most of the time, those clandestine activities are relatively
harmless, proving only embarrassing if revealed. Occasionally though,
they are devastating. Unfortunately the universe abhors secrets even
more than a vacuum and we are usually outed.
Army Captain Elisabeth Campbell (Leslie Stefanson) has mysteries she
will take to the grave. That's exactly when they are exposed.
Warrant Officer Paul Brenner (John Travolta) is finishing an
investigation into weapon sales to a civilian when he stumbles onto an
even more insidious case. Campbell is discovered dead, naked and
staked spread-eagle to tent pegs in the middle of a training area.
And she's the daughter of a three-star general.
Assigned to work with Sarah Sunhill (Madeleine Stowe), rape counselor
and investigator and - not so coincidentally since this is a movie
-- a former lover, Brenner attempts to track down the murderer.
The investigation isn't as straight-forward as it appears it
first. Campbell may have seemed the bright and shiny perfect military
officer, but she had a dark hidden side that complicates matters and
threatens to bring down the entire base.
The film is very nearly a victory of style over substance, but falters
along the way. The story doesn't quite work.
Unless there's an exceptional reason, one of the absolute "musts" of
an involving mystery film is the audience has to have enough clues, if
they are perceptive enough, to solve the crime. It doesn't happen
here.
There is no way anyone can deduce who the murderer is before he is
exposed. On the other hand, some of the participants in Campbell's
secretive past are all too apparent.
Travolta is fun to watch as he struts around in his cock-of-the-walk
role, however his character remains an enigma. We have barely a clue
as to who he is. James Woods has an interesting part as Campbell's
mentor who delights in mind games with Brenner, but drifts into
caricature too often.
Director Simon West has a film that could have been as good as it
looks if only he'd paid a little more attention to what was going on.
(Michael Redman has written this column for so many years, he's run
out of fingers and toes to keep track on. Email your closet skeletons
to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 6/24/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Author
Ross Anthony
John Travolta plays Paul Brenner, a cocky military investigator shaking up
the top brass after the General's Daughter turns up dead. It's the type of
role Bruce Willis would have loved. That's not to say John isn't
commanding -- he is; it's just that the rest of the movie isn't commanding
around him. And I'm a little more comfortable when that happens to Bruce
Willis (sorry Bruce).
An intriguing premise, Capt. Elizabeth Campbell (the daughter of General
Campbell) is found strangled and apparently raped. Soon after, Brenner
uncovers her secret life of freaky sex with enlisted men. Not surprisingly,
no one at the base appreciates the investigation.
Loaded with a cartridge of high powered actors: Travolta, Hutton, Cromwell,
Woods ... "The General's Daughter" has a poorly aligned barrel. Though a few
scenes were shot well, hitting their targets hard -- too many shells sail
way wide. The rough dialogue is, in part, responsible. When the murderer is
finally found our investigators ask the stupidest question --"Why'd you do
it?" to which they get a well deserved response, "[You're so smart.] You
tell me." (Eek). Secondly, not all the big names deliver big. Cromwell isn't
his normal self. He's a fine actor, although his performance in this film
lacks substance. Hutton isn't spectacular either.
The strongest scenes, condescending and clever, pit the egos of Woods and
Travolta head on and center. Nearly too clever, these scenes destroy their
targets anyway. Woods is wonderful.
Still, the DNA bluff sequence that attacked my modest (yet innocent)
intelligence, along with a few other faulted scenes leave this decent and
respectable story line nearly as overpowered and helpless as its own rape
victim.
Starring John Travolta, Madeleine Stowe, James Cromwell, Timothy Hutton,
James Woods and Clarence WIlliams III.
Directed by Simon West.
Screenplay by Christopher Bertolini & William Goldman.
Produced by Mace Neufeld at Paramount/Rehme/Krane.
Grade..........................C+
--
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Eugene Novikov
"Elizabeth once told me she was conducting a field investigation in
psychological warfare, and the enemy was Daddy."
Starring John Travolta, Madeline Stowe, James Cromwell, Timothy Hutton,
Clarence Williams, James Woods, Leslie Stefanson. Rated R.
I despise filmmakers that use plot exclusively as a means of getting
their movie exactly where they want it to go. Plot is a film's most
important element and it should be respected; attempts to manipulate it
for the sake of convenience will more than likely come back to haunt the
movie. The General's Daughter, a self-serving and sloppy new murder
mystery for John Travolta, is guilty as charged.
At the center of The General's Daughter is a mysterious rape and murder.
The victim is Captain Elizabeth Campbell, the daughter of a newly
retired military general (James Cromwell), which gives the case a high
profile and a desire by many to keep it under tight wraps. Thus, Officer
Paul Brenner (John Travolta), from the military's criminal investigation
division and his new rape-expert partner Sara Sunhill (Madeline Stowe)
are given 36 hours to investigate before the FBI comes in and any hopes
of keeping things quiet are destroyed.
Sooner than later, Brenner finds out about Elizabeth's spooky "extra-
curricular activities" such as an S&M fetish, complete with equipment
and violent porno tapes in a secret room in the basement. Some evidence
from the crime itself convinces his partner that this was no ordinary
rape. They then embark on a mission to "Go behind the lies", as the
movie's promotion immodestly trumpets and uncover the truth behind the
murder of Captain Elizabeth Campbell.
The General's Daughter, bless its soul, keeps the relationship between
Brenner and Sunhill completely platonic thereby avoiding the cliches
that plague movies that feature romances between two law enforcement
officials working together. Actually, I'm not even sure that the
filmmakers could have inserted a romance into this film if they tried --
its 115 minutes are already full to the brim. Alas that may be part of
the problem: there is sure a lot going on, but the story seems to have
been hastily put together and is not thought out thoroughly enough to
make so many plot elements blend together successfully. This is
especially evident in the ending, when the film apparently tries to give
us two separate explanations for what actually happened but never
bothers to sort it all out. I'm still not sure whether the first
solution we are given is merely an indirect approach to the second or
whether we are supposed to believe that Brenner never fully succeeded in
"going behind the lies".
Writer Christopher Bertolini and director Simon West (the man
responsible for Con Air, the only movie I know with a 50 minute climax)
are so concerned about the numerous details of the crime that they
completely forget about the characters at its core. Brenner and Sunhill
are little more than plot devices inserted to take us through the story.
We are never presented with any reason to care about these people or
what they do. Brenner is supposed to be a passionate man with a fierce
determination for uncovering the truth but the movie never tries to make
the character dynamic. How are we expected to give a damn about the
story if we can't get involved with its protagonists?
But what angered me the most about The General's Daughter is how it
winds up conveniently dispensing with anyone directly involved with the
crime so it can focus solely on its final theme. The movie knows what it
wants to say and is determined to say it even at the cost of sacrificing
plausibility and plot resolution. It's like a bulldozer making its way
to its final destination, blindly destroying everything in its path.
There is little in The General's Daughter to satisfy a viewer seeking
thrills and absolutely nothing to appeal to anyone seeking a
cinematically sound work. It's a movie that needs to go back to the
drawing board.
Š1999 Eugene Novikov
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Author
Jon Popick
PLANET SICK-BOY: http://www.sick-boy.com
You just can't shake the `been there, done that' feeling while sitting
through director Simon West's ConAir follow-up.  It plays like a
second-rate version of Rob Reiner's multiple Oscar nominee A Few Good
Men, driving home the tired cliché that there are three ways to do
things  the right way, the wrong way and the Army way.  File this one
under Choice No. 2.
Based on the popular Nelson DeMille novel, Daughter takes place at Fort
MacCallum in Georgia.  Warrant Officers Paul Brenner (John Travolta, A
Civil Action) and Sara Sunhill (Madeleine Stowe, Playing by Heart) are
assigned to investigate the murder of  you guessed it  the General's
daughter, Captain Elizabeth Campbell (Leslie Stefanson, Flubber).  Her
naked body was found strangled, tied down and spread-eagle on the base
during evening maneuvers.
The General is "Fighting' Joe Campbell (James Cromwell, Babe), a
retiring leader with major political ambitions.  He needs to have the
murder case sewn up in 36 hours, before the Feds come in and leak the
story to the media, spoiling his shot to run on the next Republican
Presidential ticket.  Campbell actually utters the words `just find the
son of a bitch' to Brenner.  And he gets to rhetorically ask Brenner the
tried-and-true question of whether he is a soldier or a policeman.
Brenner and Sunhill's investigation leads them to a secret room in the
basement of the deceased Campbell's home, learning that she was quite
the sexual deviant in her spare time.  Confirmation of Campbell's
extra-curricular activities arrives via Colonels Kent (Timothy Hutton,
Playing God) and Moore (James Woods, Another Day in Paradise).  The
latter, Campbell's boss and mentor, is initially accused and arrested by
Brenner, but later freed in a fatal mistake.
Daughter is kept alive only by Travolta's electric performance and
occasionally saucy one-liners.  The shallow adaptation by debut
screenwriter Christopher Bertolini is a dud, despite being `punched up'
by veteran scribe William Goldman (Absolute Power).  Sadly, Goldman is
probably best know these days as the guy who annually writes the
scathing reviews of each Oscar-nominated film in Premiere magazine.
Goldman completely annihilated Saving Private Ryan this year, but then
turns around and gives us crap like this.  Thanks a lot, pal.  (1:58 - R
for graphic images relating to sexual violence including a strong rape
scene, some perverse sexuality, nudity and language)

Author
Dustin Putman
 Directed by Simon West.
 Cast: John Travolta, Madeleine Stowe, James Woods, James Cromwell, Timothy   
 Hutton, Clarence Williams III, Leslie Stefanson, Boyd Kestner.
 1999 - 118 minutes
 Rated R (for violence, nudity, profanity, and a strong scene of rape).
 Reviewed June 20, 1999.
 Director Simon West's "The General's Daughter," based on a popular novel by 
Nelson DeMille, is an absorbing crime investigation drama, albeit one with 
some unexpected dialogue zingers. West, who last made one of 1997's most 
insultingly bad action movies, "Con Air," has greatly improved with this 
effort, but the film still cannot completely dissolve a heavy feeling of deja 
vu that hangs over the proceedings. 
 Paul Brenner (John Travolta) is a top investigator at the Army Criminal 
Investigation Division, currently going undercover as a military warrant 
officer in Georgia to arrest a criminal, complete with a thick southern 
accent. After almost getting himself filled with bullets from the suspect, he 
kills him in self-defense and thinks his work is done there. But not so fast, 
since at the same exact time this fight was going on, highly respected 
Captain Elisabeth Campbell (Leslie Stefanson), whom Brenner met twice before, 
was found on the military grounds, spread-eagle naked and strangled to death. 
Brenner is assigned the case, but only has 36 hours before the police step 
in, and is partnered with rape investigator and ex-girlfriend Sarah Sunhill 
(Madeleine Stowe). Things get decidedly seedier when Brenner and Sunhill find 
a secret room in the basement of Campbell's home that includes S&M tools and 
home-made porno tapes, and her mentor, Colonel Moore (James Woods), is 
immediately suspected of having something to do with her death, which Moore 
himself does not deny.
 One of the key comments, and criticisms, that has been made thus far about 
"The General's Daughter" is that a particular rape sequence is gratuitous and 
needlessly exploitive. I don't think so; like last spring's underrated "8mm," 
which was even more graphic, the film takes a serious, unflinching look at 
the subject at hand--a rape and a murder, and its purpose, in no way, is to 
excite or titillate. Whoever may get off at the monstrosity that is presented 
here is nothing but a sick, unstable person. Kudos, at least, to director 
West for being serious-minded when the material calls for it.
 The downfall that results from "The General's Daughter" is in the basic 
story arc; there have been so many films concerning a crime investigation 
that it is long since grown tiresome if not done with a visual or 
invigorating flare. The questionable murderer that is, indeed, involved in 
Campbell's death is fairly easy to pinpoint--it's the only central cast 
member that doesn't really have any other purpose. However, a surprise 
revelation that comes in the second half leads to several thought-provoking 
ideas, and an exceptional scene near the end between Brenner and Campbell's 
stern General father (James Cromwell), in which Travolta and Cromwell get to 
delightfully play off of one another and prove their true acting colors.
 The relationship between Brenner and Sunhill is one of the film's finer 
points, subtle and light, but also consistently pleasurable. Unfortunately, 
their past failed romance is obviously only created to give Brenner some 
much-needed character development, and somewhat comes off as contrived. 
Still, due to the snappy screenplay, by Christopher Bertolini and William 
Goldman, it is this subplot and several other sequences that are brought 
instantly to life. Aided by Madeleine Stowe's superb performance, she and 
Travolta are given a lot of chances for some witty dialogue exchanges.
 A second standout is James Woods, who hasn't made much of an impression on 
me lately (save for, perhaps, "Another Day in Paradise"), but is back in top 
form. Even when his innocence is seriously questioned, his character of 
Colonel Moore remains three-dimensional and even likable, as we somehow can 
relate to his kinship with the late Campbell, whom he clearly loved and 
respected.
 "The General's Daughter" may follow a familiar pattern that we've seen 
before, and there's no denying its many flaws (including a few noticable plot 
holes), but the film is never boring. In her brief scenes as the tragic 
Campbell, Leslie Stefanson brings a fortuitous humanity to her role, and we 
can gradually sympathize with her, particularly when her secretive background 
is revealed. Convoluted as some of the developments may be, the movie never 
loses its interest or atmosphere within the swampy, backwater Georgia town, 
and as summer popcorn-fare, it is unusually intelligent.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html
